parSem/xip/dev/GRAMMARS/PORTUGUESE/FST/src/tok-mwe1.xfst
| {por exemplo}
| {por fora da}
| {por fora da qual}
| {por fora dalgum}
| {por fora dalguma}
| {por fora dalgumas}
| {por fora dalguns}
| {por fora dali}
| {por fora daquela}
| {por fora daquelas}
| {por fora daquele}
| {por fora daqueles}
| {por fora daqueloutra}
| {por fora daqueloutras}
| {por fora daqueloutro}
| {por fora daqueloutros}
| {por fora daqui}
| {por fora daquilo}
| {por fora das}
| {por fora das quais}
| {por fora daí}
| {por fora de}
| {por fora dela}
| {por fora delas}
| {por fora dele}
| {por fora deles}
| {por fora dessa}
| {por fora dessas}
| {por fora desse}
| {por fora desses}
| {por fora dessoutra}
| {por fora dessoutras}
| {por fora dessoutro}
| {por fora dessoutros}
| {por fora desta}
| {por fora destas}
| {por fora deste}
| {por fora destes}
| {por fora destoutra}
| {por fora destoutras}
| {por fora destoutro}
| {por fora destoutros}
| {por fora disso}
| {por fora disto}
| {por fora do}
| {por fora do qual}
| {por fora do que}
| {por fora donde}
| {por fora dos}
| {por fora dos quais}
| {por fora doutra}
| {por fora doutras}
| {por fora doutro}
| {por fora doutrora}
| {por fora doutros}
| {por fora dum}
| {por fora duma}
| {por fora dumas}
| {por fora duns}
| {por isso}
| {por mais que}
| {por menos que}
| {por que}
| {por quê}
| {por trás da}
| {por trás da qual}
| {por trás dalgum}
| {por trás dalguma}
| {por trás dalgumas}
| {por trás dalguns}
| {por trás dali}
| {por trás daquela}
| {por trás daquelas}
| {por trás daquele}
| {por trás daqueles}
| {por trás daqueloutra}
| {por trás daqueloutras}
| {por trás daqueloutro}
| {por trás daqueloutros}
| {por trás daqui}
| {por trás daquilo}
| {por trás das}
| {por trás das quais}
| {por trás daí}
| {por trás de}
| {por trás dela}
| {por trás delas}
| {por trás dele}
| {por trás deles}
| {por trás dessa}
| {por trás dessas}
| {por trás desse}
| {por trás desses}
| {por trás dessoutra}
| {por trás dessoutras}
| {por trás dessoutro}
| {por trás dessoutros}
| {por trás desta}
| {por trás destas}
| {por trás deste}
| {por trás destes}
| {por trás destoutra}
| {por trás destoutras}
| {por trás destoutro}
| {por trás destoutros}
| {por trás disso}
| {por trás disto}
| {por trás do}
| {por trás do qual}
| {por trás do que}
| {por trás donde}
| {por trás dos}
| {por trás dos quais}
| {por trás doutra}
| {por trás doutras}
| {por trás doutro}
| {por trás doutrora}
| {por trás doutros}
| {por trás dum}
| {por trás duma}
| {por trás dumas}
| {por trás duns}
| {posto que}
| {quaisquer umas}
| {quaisquer uns}
| {qualquer um}
| {qualquer uma}
| {raios te partam}
| {salvo se}
| {se bem que}
| {sem que}
| {sempre que}
| {sob pena da}
| {sob pena da qual}
| {sob pena dalgum}
| {sob pena dalguma}
| {sob pena dalgumas}
| {sob pena dalguns}
| {sob pena dali}
| {sob pena daquela}
| {sob pena daquelas}
| {sob pena daquele}
| {sob pena daqueles}
| {sob pena daqueloutra}
| {sob pena daqueloutras}
| {sob pena daqueloutro}
| {sob pena daqueloutros}
| {sob pena daqui}
| {sob pena daquilo}
| {sob pena das}
| {sob pena das quais}
| {sob pena daí}
| {sob pena de}
| {sob pena dela}
| {sob pena delas}
| {sob pena dele}
| {sob pena deles}
| {sob pena dessa}
| {sob pena dessas}
| {sob pena desse}
| {sob pena desses}
| {sob pena dessoutra}
| {sob pena dessoutras}
| {sob pena dessoutro}
| {sob pena dessoutros}
| {sob pena desta}
| {sob pena destas}
| {sob pena deste}
| {sob pena destes}
| {sob pena destoutra}
| {sob pena destoutras}
| {sob pena destoutro}
| {sob pena destoutros}
| {sob pena disso}
| {sob pena disto}
| {sob pena do}
| {sob pena do qual}
| {sob pena do que}
| {sob pena donde}
| {sob pena dos}
| {sob pena dos quais}
| {sob pena doutra}
| {sob pena doutras}
| {sob pena doutro}
| {sob pena doutrora}
| {sob pena doutros}
| {sob pena dum}
| {sob pena duma}
| {sob pena dumas}
| {sob pena duns}
| {suposto que}
| {tais como}
| {tal como}
| {toda vez que}
| {todas as vezes que}
| {uma vez que}
| {visto que}
];

# ------------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> initial upper case
define CAP [
     a (->) A, b (->) B, c (->) C, d (->) D, e (->) E, f (->) F,
     g (->) G, h (->) H, i (->) I, j (->) J, k (->) K, l (->) L,
     m (->) M, n (->) N, o (->) O, p (->) P, q (->) Q, r (->) R,
     s (->) S, t (->) T, u (->) U, v (->) V, w (->) W, x (->) X,
     y (->) Y, z (->) Z, 
     à (->) [À|A],
     é (->) [É|E]       || .#. _ 
] ;


# ------------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> combine
read regex [
    [ EXPR .o. CAP ].l
];

print size
